test/src/gt-desc-yamls/badunass_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Unassimilated and badly assimilated words in CELSIUS_UNASS, KINO-UNASS, NOADE_BADASS and GAHPER_BADASS.

Tests:
  Noun - kompendium: # CELSIUS_UNASS, NOADE_BADASS
    kompendium+N+Sg+Nom: kompendium
    kompendium+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Nom: kompendia
    kompendium+N+Sg+Acc: kompendiumav
    kompendium+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Acc: kompendiav
    kompendium+N+Sg+Com: kompendiumajn
    kompendium+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: kompendiumajna
    kompendium+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com: kompendiajn
    kompendium+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: kompendiajna
    kompendium+N+Ess: kompendiuman
    kompendium+Err/Orth+N+Ess: kompendian
    
  Noun - aids: # CELSIUS_UNASS
    aids+N+Sg+Nom: aids
    aids+N+Sg+Acc: aidsav
    aids+N+Sg+Com: aidsajn
    aids+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: aidsajna
    aids+N+Ess: aidsan
 
  Noun - maori: # KINO_UNASS
    maori+N+Sg+Nom: maori
    maori+N+Sg+Acc: maoriv
    maori+N+Sg+Com: maorijn
    maori+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: maorijna
    maori+N+Ess: maorin
  
  Noun - farisea: # NOADE_BADASS
    farisea+N+Sg+Nom: farisea
    farisea+N+Sg+Acc: fariseav
    farisea+N+Sg+Com: fariseajn
    farisea+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: fariseajna
    farisea+N+Ess: farisean
    
  Noun - interviermme: # NOADE_BADASS, Err/Lex
    interviermme+Err/Lex+N+Sg+Nom: interviermme
    interviermme+Err/Lex+N+Sg+Ine: interviermmen
    interviermme+Err/Lex+N+Sg+Ill: [interværmmáj, intervärmmáj]
    
  Noun - fábel: # GAHPER_BADASS
    fábel+N+Sg+Nom: fábel
    fábel+N+Sg+Acc: fábelav
    fábel+N+Sg+Com: fábelijn
    fábel+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: fábelijna
    fábel+N+Ess: fábelin
    
  Noun - boaksa: # BOAKSA_BADASS, MUORRA
    boaksa+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Nom: boaksa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Nom: boaksa
    boaksa+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Acc: båksav
    boaksa+N+Sg+Acc: båvsav
    boaksa+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com: båksajn
    boaksa+N+Sg+Com: båvsajn
    boaksa+Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: båksajna
    boaksa+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: båvsajna
    boaksa+Err/Orth+N+Ess: boaksan
    boaksa+N+Ess: boaksan
 
